Massachusetts, session 194th, H3602.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) There shall be a special legislative commission established pursuant to
section 2A of chapter 4 of the General Laws to investigate and study the feasibility of
establishing a statewide Massachusetts Caribbean American Cultural Center in the City of
Boston.
(b) The commission shall investigate and study various methods for establishing a
Massachusetts Caribbean American Cultural Center in the City of Boston, including, but not
limited to, the creation of a nonprofit organization to oversee the construction and management
of the Massachusetts Caribbean American Cultural Center. The commission shall consider the
representation of the over 300-year history of Caribbeans in the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts and shall evaluate the costs associated with each method.
SECTION 2. (a) The commission shall be composed of the following members:
of 2

(1) three members of the House of Representatives, three of whom shall be of Caribbean
descent or represent a district with a significant population of Caribbean people, two of whom
shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, and one of whom shall be
appointed by the House Minority Leader;
(2) three members of the Senate, three of whom shall be of Caribbean descent or
represent a district with a significant population of Caribbean people, two of whom shall be
appointed by the Senate President, and one of whom shall be appointed by the Senate Minority
Leader;
(3) one person to be appointed by the Mayor of the City of Boston;
(4) one person to be appointed by the Governor; and
(5) not more than fifteen additional members from across the Commonwealth of
Massachusetts, whose appointments shall be considered and approved by three members of the
House of Representatives and three members of the Senate. The commission shall elect two co-
chairs from among its members.
(b) All appointments to the commission shall be made no later than June 30, 2026.
SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its findings, including any recommendations
for legislation, to the clerks of the House of Representatives and the Senate no later than
December 31, 2026.
of 2